Mississippi, session 2026, SB2508.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF MISSISSIPPI: SECTION 1. (1)  This section shall be known and may be cited as the "2026 Youth Mental Health Access for All Act." (2)  The Legislature finds and declares the following: (a)  The State of Mississippi is currently experiencing a critical mental health crisis among its youth that requires immediate, scalable, and innovative intervention; (b)  Providing students with around-the-clock access to professional teletherapy is a necessary, complementary resource to existing school counselors, ensuring support is available during after-school hours, weekends, and holidays; and (c)  To ensure student safety and fiscal responsibility, the state must contract with established, high-capacity vendors capable of immediate and equitable statewide deployment. (3)  (a)  There is established the "Student 24/7 Teletherapy Pilot Project" within the State Department of Education. (b)  The State Department of Education shall award grant funding to school districts, charter schools, and nonpublic schools for the provision of teletherapy services to students in Grades 5 through 12. (c)  The pilot project is intended to provide coverage for over two hundred fifteen thousand (215,000) youth across the state. (4)  (a)  It is the intent of the Legislature that this pilot project be funded out of any money in the Education Enhancement Fund not otherwise appropriated. (b)  The State Department of Education is authorized to use up to ten percent (10%) of the funds appropriated for this pilot project to administer the program, including, but not limited to, the development of the grant application process, oversight of vendor compliance, and data collection. (5)  To ensure the stability and safety of the services provided under this pilot project, any participating vendor must meet the following minimum qualifications: (a)  At least ten (10) years of experience in the telehealth or teletherapy industry; (b)  Current service of no fewer than fifty thousand (50,000) students in a K-12 or post-secondary educational setting; and (c)  A community of clinicians, all licensed, who have been vetted for experience in and passion for supporting student mental health. (6)  The vendor's platform and service model must provide the following features: (a)  Around-the-clock access, with "Appointment Now" features, including licensed therapists, direct crisis connection, and on-demand wellness resources; (b)  Barrier-free access, providing services at no cost to students, with no insurance or referral requirements and no financial barriers to entry; (c)  Technology-supported student autonomy, allowing students to choose their own therapist based on preference via video, phone, chat, or asynchronous messaging; (d)  Clinical alignment, with services functioning as an extension of the school's team, complementing existing mental health offerings and aligning with local district protocols and state mandatory reporting laws; and (e)  Data transparency, providing districts with real-time data and usage analytics while maintaining strict HIPAA and FERPA compliance. (7)  The State Department of Education shall submit a report to the Legislature by October 1, 2027, detailing the participation rates, usage data, and student outcomes observed during the first year of the pilot project. SECTION 2.  Section 37-61-33, Mississippi Code of 1972, is amended as follows: 37-61-33.  (1)  There is created within the State Treasury a special fund to be designated the "Education Enhancement Fund" into which shall be deposited all the revenues collected pursuant to Sections 27-65-75(5), (7) and (8), 27-67-31(a) and (b) and Section 2 of this act. (2)  Of the amount deposited into the Education Enhancement Fund, Sixteen Million Dollars ($16,000,000.00) shall be appropriated each fiscal year to the State Department of Education to be distributed to all school districts.  Such money shall be distributed to all school districts in the proportion that the net enrollment of each school district bears to the net enrollment of all school districts within the state for the following purposes: (a)  Purchasing, erecting, repairing, equipping, remodeling and enlarging school buildings and related facilities, including gymnasiums, auditoriums, lunchrooms, vocational training buildings, libraries, teachers' homes, school barns, transportation vehicles (which shall include new and used transportation vehicles) and garages for transportation vehicles, and purchasing land therefor; (b)  Establishing and equipping school athletic fields and necessary facilities connected therewith, and purchasing land therefor; (c)  Providing necessary water, light, heating, air-conditioning and sewerage facilities for school buildings, and purchasing land therefor; (d)  As a pledge to pay all or a portion of the debt service on debt issued by the school district under Sections 37-59-1 through 37-59-45, 37-59-101 through 37-59-115, 37-7-351 through 37-7-359, 37-41-89 through 37-41-99, 37-7-301, 37-7-302 and 37-41-81, or debt issued by boards of supervisors for agricultural high schools pursuant to Section 37-27-65, if such pledge is accomplished pursuant to a written contract or resolution approved and spread upon the minutes of an official meeting of the district's school board or board of supervisors.  The annual grant to such district in any subsequent year during the term of the resolution or contract shall not be reduced below an amount equal to the district's grant amount for the year in which the contract or resolution was adopted.  The intent of this provision is to allow school districts to irrevocably pledge a certain, constant stream of revenue as security for long-term obligations issued under the code sections enumerated in this paragraph or as otherwise allowed by law.  It is the intent of the Legislature that the provisions of this paragraph shall be cumulative and supplemental to any existing funding programs or other authority conferred upon school districts or school boards. Debt of a district secured by a pledge of sales tax revenue pursuant to this paragraph shall not be subject to any debt limitation contained in the foregoing enumerated code sections; * * * and (e)  To fund the Student 24/7 Teletherapy Pilot Project established in Section 1 of this act; and ( * * *ef)  Any other purpose for which the total funding formula funds as determined by Sections 37-151-200 through 37-151-215 are not sufficient. (3)  The remainder of the money deposited into the Education Enhancement Fund shall be appropriated as follows: (a)  To the State Department of Education as follows: (i)  Sixteen and sixty-one one-hundredths percent (16.61%) to the cost of the total funding formula determined under Sections 37-151-200 through 37-151-215; of the funds generated by the percentage set forth in this section for the support of the adequate education program, one and one hundred seventy-eight one-thousandths percent (1.178%) of the funds shall be appropriated to be used by the State Department of Education for the purchase of textbooks to be loaned under Sections 37-43-1 through 37-43-59 to approved nonpublic schools, as described in Section 37-43-1.  The funds to be distributed to each nonpublic school shall be in the proportion that the average daily attendance of each nonpublic school bears to the total average daily attendance of all nonpublic schools; (ii)  Seven and ninety-seven one-hundredths percent (7.97%) to assist the funding of transportation operations and maintenance pursuant to Section 37-19-23; and (iii)  Nine and sixty-one one-hundredths percent (9.61%) for classroom supplies, instructional materials and equipment, including computers and computer software, to be distributed to all eligible teachers within the state through the use of procurement cards or a digital solution capable of tracking, paying and reporting purchases.  Classroom supply funds shall not be expended for administrative purposes.  On a date to be determined by the State Department of Education, but not later than July 1 of each year, local school districts shall determine and submit to the State Department of Education the number of teachers eligible to receive an allocation for the current year.  For purposes of this subparagraph, "teacher" means any employee of the school board of a school district, or the Mississippi School for the Arts, the Mississippi School for Math and Science, the Mississippi School for the Blind, the Mississippi School for the Deaf or public charter school, who is required by law to obtain a teacher's license from the State Department of Education and who is assigned to an instructional area of work as defined by the department, and shall include any full- or part-time gifted or special education teacher.  It is the intent of the Legislature that all classroom teachers shall utilize these funds in a manner that addresses individual classroom needs and supports the overall goals of the school regarding supplies, instructional materials, equipment, computers or computer software under the provisions of this subparagraph, including the type, quantity and quality of such supplies, materials and equipment. Classroom supply funds allocated under this subparagraph shall supplement, not replace, other local and state funds available for the same purposes.  The State Board of Education shall develop and promulgate rules and regulations for the administration of this subparagraph consistent with the above criteria, with particular emphasis on allowing the individual teachers to expend funds as they deem appropriate.  The local school board shall require each school to issue credentials for a digital solution selected by or procurement cards provided by the Department of Finance and Administration under the provisions of Section 31-7-9(1)(c) for the use of teachers and necessary support personnel in making instructional supply fund expenditures under this section, consistent with the regulations of the Mississippi Department of Finance and Administration pursuant to Section 31-7-9.  Such credentials or procurement cards shall be provided by the State Department of Education to local school districts on a date determined by the State Department of Education, but not later than August 1 of each year.  Local school districts shall issue such credentials or procurement cards to classroom teachers at the beginning of the school year, but no later than August 1 of each year, and shall be issued in equal amounts per teacher determined by the total number of qualifying personnel and the current state appropriation for classroom supplies with the Education Enhancement Fund.  After initial cards are issued under the timeline prescribed by this section, the State Department of Education may issue cards to districts for any classroom teacher hired after July 1 under a timeline prescribed by the State Department of Education.  Such credentials or cards will expire on a predetermined date at the end of each school year, but not before April 1 of each year; (b)  Twenty-two and nine one-hundredths percent (22.09%) to the Board of Trustees of State Institutions of Higher Learning for the purpose of supporting institutions of higher learning; and (c)  Fourteen and forty-one one-hundredths percent (14.41%) to the Mississippi Community College Board for the purpose of providing support to community and junior colleges. (4)  The amount remaining in the Education Enhancement Fund after funds are distributed as provided in subsections (2) and (3) of this section shall be appropriated for other educational needs. (5)  None of the funds appropriated pursuant to subsection (3)(a) of this section shall be used to reduce the state's General Fund appropriation for the categories listed in an amount below the following amounts: (a)  For subsection (3)(a)(ii) of this section, Thirty-six Million Seven Hundred Thousand Dollars ($36,700,000.00); (b)  For the aggregate of minimum program allotments in the 1997 fiscal year, formerly provided for in Chapter 19, Title 37, Mississippi Code of 1972, as amended, excluding those funds for transportation as provided for in paragraph (a) of this subsection. (6)  Any funds appropriated from the Education Enhancement Fund that are unexpended at the end of a fiscal year shall lapse into the Education Enhancement Fund. SECTION 3.  This act shall take effect and be in force from and after its passage.